Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 3. General Provisions.

Sec. 08.32.185.
Application of Administrative Procedure Act.

AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) applies to any action taken by the board under this chapter.

History.

(§ 14 ch 59 SLA 1978)

Sec. 08.32.187.
Application of chapter.

This chapter applies to a person who practices, or offers or attempts to practice, as a dental hygienist in the state except

a dental hygienist in the military service in the discharge of official duties;

a dental hygienist in the employ of the United States Public Health Service, United States Department of Veterans Affairs, United States Indian Health Service, or another agency of the federal government, in the discharge of official duties;

a dental hygienist licensed in another state or jurisdiction who is teaching or demonstrating clinical techniques at a meeting, seminar, or limited course of instruction sponsored by a dental or dental auxiliary society or association or by an accredited dental or dental auxiliary educational institution;

a dental hygienist employed in the state by an Indian health program, as that term is defined in 25 U.S.C. 1603, while providing dental hygiene services to a person the Indian health program is entitled to serve under 25 U.S.C. 450 et seq. (Indian Self-Determination and Education Assistance Act), as amended, and 25 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Indian Health Care Improvement Act), as amended.

A person excepted from this chapter under (a) of this section shall be held to the same standard of care as a person covered by this chapter.

History.

(§ 16 ch 100 SLA 1984; am § 11 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 16 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Editor's notes. --

Paragraph (4) of this section refers to 25 U.S.C. 450 et seq., which was renumbered in 2016 as 25 U.S.C. 5301, et seq., by the U.S. House of Representatives, Office of Law Revision Counsel.

Opinions of attorney general. —

So long as they are employed by Native Health clinics and treat patients authorized to receive care in those clinics, individuals certified as dental health aides by the federal Community Health Aide Certification Board do not have to comply with state dental licensure laws. The state dental licensure laws stand as an obstacle to Congress’ objective to provide dental treatment to Alaska Natives by using non-dentist, non-hygienist paraprofessionals. Therefore, the federal statute that mandates the development of the dental health aide standards and the certification of dental health aides displaces (or preempts) the state’s dental licensure law and renders it unenforceable against federally-certified dental health aides. September 8, 2005 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 08.32.190.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“board” means the Board of Dental Examiners;

“direct supervision” means the dentist is in the dental office, personally diagnoses the condition to be treated, personally authorizes the procedure, and before dismissal of the patient evaluates the performance of the dental hygienist;

“general supervision” means the dentist has authorized the procedures and they are being carried out in accordance with the dentist’s diagnosis and treatment plan;

“indirect supervision” means a licensed dentist is in the dental facility, authorizes the procedures, and remains in the dental facility while the procedures are being performed by the dental hygienist;

“licensed dental hygienist” means a dental hygienist licensed under this chapter;

“licensed dentist” means a dentist licensed under AS 08.36.

History.

(am § 13 ch 59 SLA 1978; am §§ 17, 40 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1987 and 2012 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Chapter 78, SLA 1953, which enacted many provisions found in this chapter, did not define “board,” but instead used “Board of Dental Examiners” throughout the provisions enacted by ch. 78, SLA 1953.
In the 1962 codification, the term “board” was used throughout the chapter, and this section was created to define “board.”